Missouri, session 2026, HB3270.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 221, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 221.358, to read as follows:
221.358. 1. Except as provided under subsections 2 and 3 of this section, no
person shall be permitted to enter any county or municipal jail, detention center, or
holding facility except by special permission of the sheriff, chief of police, jail
administrator, or other chief administrative officer of the facility, or under such
regulations as such persons shall prescribe.
2. The following persons shall be authorized to visit any county or municipal jail,
detention center, or holding facility at any reasonable time, subject to such rules as may
be deemed necessary for maintaining security and safety:
(1) The governor; lieutenant governor; members of the general assembly; judges
of the supreme court, courts of appeal, and circuit courts; attorney general; state
auditor; state treasurer; and secretary of state;
(2) Members of any county commission or township board within the county,
county judges, county prosecutors, and sheriffs;
(3) Mayors, city council members, aldermen, municipal judges, and city
attorneys of any city that operates or contracts for the operation of a jail or detention
facility within the jurisdiction; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3270 2
(4) Duly authorized employees, assistants, or agents of the officers listed under
subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection, when acting under specific authorization
of their superiors and in accordance with established regulations.
3. All clergy or religious leaders of any recognized faith or denomination shall
have access to such county and municipal facilities and may visit any person confined
therein, subject to such rules as may be necessary to maintain order and security. Such
clergy may administer the rites, sacraments, or ceremonies of their faith to any person
confined in such facility who requests it, in accordance with the facility's rules.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of any facility
to regulate visitation for the purpose of maintaining the safety, security, and good order
of the institution or to deny access to any individual for cause.
✔